Wisconsin, session 2025, AB595.
do enact as follows:AB595,1Section 1. 5.05 (19) of the statutes is created to read:5.05 (19) Voter citizenship audit. The commission shall cooperate with the legislative audit bureau to conduct the audit under s. 13.94 (11) to identify individuals listed in the official registration list under s. 6.36 who are not U.S. citizens. The commission shall also direct each municipal clerk and board of election commissioners to cooperate with the legislative audit bureau to conduct the audit under s. 13.94 (11).AB595,2Section 2. 5.056 of the statutes is amended to read:5.056 Matching program with secretary of transportation. The commission administrator shall enter into the agreement with the secretary of transportation specified under s. 85.61 (1) to match personally identifiable information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 6.36 (1) and the information specified in s. 6.34 (2m) with personally identifiable information maintained by the department of transportation. The agreement shall require the department of transportation to provide the commission access to personally identifiable information maintained by the department of transportation in order to verify that individuals on the official registration list are U.S. citizens. The commission shall immediately verify the information on the list whenever an individual registers to vote or modifies his or her registration. The administrator and the secretary shall update the agreement at least once every 2 years.AB595,3Section 3. 5.057 of the statutes is created to read:5.057 Matching program with the state registrar. The commission administrator shall enter into the agreement specified under s. 69.03 (16) with the state registrar appointed under s. 69.02 (1) (b) to match personally identifiable information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 6.36 (1) and the information specified in s. 6.34 (2m) with personally identifiable information and vital statistics maintained by the state registrar. The administrator and the registrar shall update the agreement at least once every 2 years.AB595,4Section 4. 5.058 of the statutes is created to read:5.058 Matching program with the department of corrections. The commission administrator shall enter into the agreement with the secretary of corrections specified under s. 301.03 (20m) to match personally identifiable information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 6.36 (1) and the information specified in s. 6.34 (2m) with the personally identifiable information provided under s. 301.03 (20m). The administrator and the secretary shall update the agreement at least once every 2 years.AB595,5Section 5. 5.061 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:5.061 (3) A If a complaint received under this section raises a substantial question of material fact, the complainant under sub. (1) or any of the complainants in a consolidated complaint under sub. (2) may make a written request for a hearing and the matter shall then be treated as a contested case under ch. 227, except that the commission shall make a final determination with respect to the merits of the complaint and issue a decision within 89 days of the time that the complaint or the earliest of any complaints was filed, unless the complainant, or each of any complainants whose complaints are consolidated, consents to a specified longer period. If a complaint raises a substantial question of material fact, but neither the complainant nor any of the complainants in a consolidated complaint request a hearing, the commission may conduct a hearing as provided under ch. 227. A hearing under this subsection shall be held in open session and the oral proceedings of the hearing shall be recorded by stenographic or electronic means, consistent with s. 227.44 (8). Hearing records shall be available for public inspection, as provided under s. 5.05 (5s) (a). The commission shall make a transcript of the oral proceedings available for public inspection and in preparation for judicial review, as provided under s. 227.44 (8).AB595,6Section 6. 5.061 (5) of the statutes is created to read:5.061 (5) If the commission receives a complaint under sub. (1) that alleges that the commission itself is violating Title III of P.L. 107-252, or that such a violation is likely to occur as a result of action or inaction by the commission, and the complaint raises a substantial question of material fact, the commission shall make a final determination with respect to the merits of the complaint and issue a decision. The commission may not dismiss the complaint simply because the complaint alleges a violation by the commission.AB595,7Section 7. 5.061 (6) of the statutes is created to read:5.061 (6) A complainant may seek judicial review under ch. 227 of any order issued under this section that dismisses the complaint or otherwise does not grant the relief requested in the complaint. The commission shall publish the results of all complaints dismissed under this section on the website maintained by the commission. All final determinations made by the commission under this section shall be in writing.AB595,8Section 8. 6.275 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:6.275 (1) (f) The total number of postcards sent by the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners under s. 6.56 (3), the total number of such postcards returned to the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners because the elector did not reside at the address given on the postcard, the total number of electors whose status was changed from eligible to ineligible on removed from the registration list as a result of the audit under s. 6.56 (3), and the number of individuals referred to the district attorney under s. 6.56 (3). The municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall provide the information described under this paragraph to the elections commission and the county clerk or county board of election commissioners at the earliest practicable time after, but no later than 90 days after, each primary and election at which a state or national office is filled or a statewide referendum is held, including any special election. The municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall update the information described under this paragraph on a monthly basis and shall submit, on a monthly basis, any such updated information to the elections commission and the county clerk or county board of election commissioners.AB595,9Section 9. 6.32 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:6.32 (4) If the form is sufficient to accomplish registration and the commission or clerk has no reliable information to indicate that the proposed elector is not qualified, the commission or clerk shall enter the elector’s name on the registration list and transmit a 1st class letter or postcard to the registrant, specifying the elector’s ward or aldermanic district, or both, if any, and polling place. The letter or postcard shall be sent within 10 days of receipt of the form. If the letter or postcard is returned, or if the commission or clerk is informed of a different address than the one specified by the elector, the commission or clerk shall change the status of remove the elector on from the list from eligible to ineligible. The letter or postcard shall be marked in accordance with postal regulations to ensure that it will be returned to the commission or clerk if the elector does not reside at the address given on the letter or postcard.AB595,10Section 10. 6.33 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:6.33 (4) When an individual’s registration is changed from eligible to ineligible status individual is removed from the registration list for any reason, the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall enter notify the commission, providing the date of and reason for change on removal from the registration list. The commission shall keep a permanent record of the removal, including the date of and reason for the removal.AB595,11Section 11. 6.33 (5) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:6.33 (5) (a) 1. Except as provided in par. (b) and this paragraph, whenever a municipal clerk receives a valid registration or valid change of a name or address under an existing registration or changes a registration from eligible to ineligible status, the municipal clerk or the clerk’s designee shall promptly enter electronically on the list maintained by the commission under s. 6.36 (1) the information required under that subsection.AB595,12Section 12. 6.36 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:6.36 (1) (d) Upon receipt of official notification by the appropriate election administrative authority of another state, territory, or possession that an elector whose name appears on the list has registered to vote in that state, territory, or possession, the commission or the municipal clerk of the municipality where the elector formerly resided shall change the elector’s registration from eligible to ineligible status remove the elector’s name from the registration list.AB595,13Section 13. 6.36 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:6.36 (1) (e) If the commission adds the name of any elector to the list, the commission shall promptly notify the municipal clerk of the municipality where the elector resides. If the commission changes the registration of any elector from eligible to ineligible status removes an elector from the list, the commission shall promptly notify the municipal clerk of the municipality where the elector resides or, if the elector has changed his or her residence from one municipality to another municipality in this state, shall promptly notify the municipal clerk of the municipality where the elector resided prior to the change removal. Notification shall be made in writing or by electronic transmission. If the commission changes the registration of any elector from eligible to ineligible status removes an elector from the list for any reason, the commission shall make an entry on the list keep a permanent record giving the date of and the reason for the change removal.AB595,14Section 14. 6.36 (6) of the statutes is repealed.AB595,15Section 15. 6.36 (6m) of the statutes is created to read:6.36 (6m) Subject to the restrictions under sub. (1) (b), a person may obtain a copy of the official registration list, or any portion of the list, electronically by paying to the commission a fee established by the commission of $1,000 or less. If a person wishes to obtain a physical copy of the official registration list, or any portion of the list, the commission may charge the person a fee in addition to the fee established by the commission under this subsection in order to cover the cost of reproducing the list in physical form and the cost of postage, if any.AB595,16Section 16. 6.47 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:6.47 (6) Upon expiration of a confidential listing on a registration list under sub. (2), the municipal clerk shall change the registration of remove the protected individual to ineligible status from the registration list unless the individual files a new request and qualifies under sub. (2) to obtain a renewal of the listing or unless the individual applies for and qualifies to obtain a nonconfidential voter registration. Except as authorized in sub. (8), the municipal clerk shall withhold from public inspection under s. 19.35 (1) the name and address of any individual whose registration is changed removed under this subsection if the individual qualified for a confidential listing at the time of that listing.AB595,17Section 17. 6.47 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:6.47 (7) (b) If notice to a protected individual is not provided under par. (a), the municipal clerk shall provide notice to the subject individual upon changing a listed individual to ineligible status removing a listed individual from the registration list under sub. (6).AB595,18Section 18. 6.48 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:6.48 (1) (d) If the clerk determines that the challenged elector is not qualified, the clerk shall change the challenged elector’s registration from eligible to ineligible status on remove the elector from the registration list and notify the inspectors for the ward or election district where the elector was registered.AB595,19Section 19. 6.48 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:6.48 (2) (b) Upon appearing in person, objectors shall be examined, under oath, by the commissioners and testimony taken. Judgment rests with the board of election commissioners and decisions shall be rendered as soon as heard. All cases are heard and decided summarily. The commissioners shall determine whether the person objected to is qualified. If they the commissioners determine that a person is not qualified, the executive director of the board of election commissioners shall change the elector from eligible to ineligible status on remove the person from the registration list and shall notify the proper ward officials of the change immediately.AB595,20Section 20. 6.50 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (2) If an elector to whom a notice of suspension was mailed under sub. (1) has not applied for continuation of registration within 30 days of the date of mailing, the commission shall change the registration status of that elector from eligible to ineligible remove the elector from the registration list on the day that falls 30 days after the date of mailing.AB595,21Section 21. 6.50 (2g) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (2g) The commission may delegate to a municipal clerk or board of election commissioners of a municipality the responsibility to change the registration status of remove electors from the registration list when required under sub. (2).AB595,22Section 22. 6.50 (2r) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (2r) (g) The number of electors who received notices under sub. (1) and whose status changed from eligible to ineligible who were removed from the registration list.AB595,23Section 23. 6.50 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (3) Upon receipt of reliable information that a registered elector has changed his or her residence to a location outside of the municipality, the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall notify the elector by mailing a notice by 1st class mail to the elector’s registration address stating the source of the information. All municipal departments and agencies receiving information that a registered elector has changed his or her residence shall notify the clerk or board of election commissioners. If the elector no longer resides in the municipality or fails to apply for continuation of registration within 30 days of the date the notice is mailed, the clerk or board of election commissioners shall change the elector’s registration from eligible to ineligible status remove the elector from the registration list. Upon receipt of reliable information that a registered elector has changed his or her residence within the municipality, the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall change the elector’s registration and mail the elector a notice of the change. This subsection does not restrict the right of an elector to challenge any registration under s. 6.325, 6.48, 6.925, 6.93, or 7.52 (5).AB595,24Section 24. 6.50 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (4) The municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall change the registration of remove deceased electors from eligible to ineligible status the registration list by means of checking vital statistics reports. No notice need be sent of registration changes removals made under this subsection.AB595,25Section 25. 6.50 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:6.50 (4m) If the commission determines, on the basis of the information received under s. 69.03 (16), 85.61 (1), or 301.03 (20m), that a person on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 6.36 (1) is deceased or not otherwise an eligible elector, the commission shall change the status of the person’s registration from eligible to ineligible. No notice need be sent of registration changes made under this subsection with regard to a deceased elector. This subsection does not relieve a municipal clerk or board of election commissioners from the responsibility for changing the status of registered electors as otherwise provided under this chapter.AB595,26Section 26. 6.50 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (5) The registration of any elector whose address is listed at a building which that has been condemned for human habitation by the municipality under s. 66.0413 (1) (j) shall be investigated by the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners. If the clerk or board of election commissioners can find no reason why the such an elector should remain on the registration of such an elector should not be changed from eligible to ineligible status list, the clerk or board of election commissioners shall change the elector’s registration status remove the elector from the list. If the elector has left a forwarding address with the U.S. postal service, a notice of change in status removal shall be mailed by the clerk or board of election commissioners to the forwarding address.AB595,27Section 27. 6.50 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (6) The municipal clerk, upon authorization by an elector, shall change the elector’s registration from eligible to ineligible status remove the elector from the registration list.AB595,28Section 28. 6.50 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:6.50 (7) When an elector’s registration is changed from eligible to ineligible status elector is removed from the registration list, the commission, municipal clerk, or board of election commissioners shall make an entry on the registration list keep a permanent record of the removal, giving the date of and reason for the change. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab595 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab595 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB595 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB595 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB595: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting